Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 43

Tennessee Professional Employer Organization Act

62-43-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Professional Employer Organization Act.”

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Applicant” means a person seeking an initial or renewal registration pursuant to this chapter;

“Audit” means an engagement performed in accordance with the Statements on Auditing Standards (SAS);

“Client” means any person who enters into a professional employer agreement with a professional employer organization;

“Co-employer” means either a professional employer organization or a client;

“Co-employment relationship” means a relationship which is intended to be an ongoing relationship rather than a temporary or project specific one, wherein the rights, duties, and obligations of an employer which arise out of an employment relationship have been shared and allocated between co-employers pursuant to a professional employer agreement and this chapter;

“Covered employee”:

Means an individual having a co-employment relationship with a professional employer organization and a client who meets all of the following criteria:

The individual has received written notice of co-employment with the professional employer organization; and

The individual's co-employment relationship results pursuant to a professional employer agreement; and

Includes individuals who are officers, directors, shareholders, partners, and managers of the client; provided, that such individuals meet the criteria of subdivision (6)(A) and act as operational managers or perform day-to-day operational services for the client, unless the professional employer organization and the client have expressly agreed in the professional employer agreement that such individuals shall not be covered employees;

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Local governmental entity” means a governing body, board, commission, committee or department of a municipality or county;

“Person” has the same meaning as in § 1-3-105 and as amended;

“Professional employer agreement” means a written contract between a client and a professional employer organization that provides:

For the co-employment of covered employees;

For the allocation of employer rights and obligations between the client and the professional employer organization with respect to covered employees; and

That the professional employer organization and the client assume the responsibilities required by this chapter;

“Professional employer organization”:

Means any person engaged in the business of providing professional employer services, regardless of the use of the term or conducting business as a “professional employer organization,” “PEO,” “staff leasing company,” “registered staff leasing company,” “employee leasing company,” “administrative employer,” or any other name; and

Includes a professional employer organization group;

“Professional employer organization benefit and welfare plan” means a plan offered to covered employees of a professional employer organization registered pursuant to this chapter;

“Professional employer organization group” means two (2) or more professional employer organizations that are majority owned or commonly controlled by the same entity, parent or controlling person;

“Professional employer services” means the service of entering into co-employment relationships under this chapter in which all or a majority of the employees providing services to a client, a division or work unit of a client are covered employees;

“Registrant” means a professional employer organization registered under this chapter;

“Small operations” means an applicant or registrant with less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in annualized wages;

“Temporary help services” means services consisting of a person:

Recruiting and hiring its own employees;

Finding other organizations that need the services of its employees;

Assigning its employees:

To perform work at or services for the other organizations to support or supplement the other organizations' workforces;

To provide assistance in special work situations such as, but not limited to, employee absences, skill shortages or seasonal workloads; or

To perform special assignments or projects; and

Customarily attempting to reassign its employees to other organizations when they finish each assignment; and

“Working capital” means the excess of current assets over current liabilities as determined by generally accepted accounting principles.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-103. Rules — Creation of professional employer organization advisory council — Composition of council — Officers — Compensation — Powers and duties — Administration — Recommendations for appointments to council.

The department may promulgate rules and prescribe forms reasonably necessary for the administration and enforcement of §§ 62-43-106, 62-43-107 and 62-43-112.

Rules shall be promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5 and as amended.

The professional employer organization advisory council is created and shall consist of five (5) members to be appointed by the governor to four (4) year terms. A term shall become effective on appointment and continue until a successor has been appointed. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment to the unexpired term by the governor.

Three (3) members of the council shall be individuals owning or working for a professional employer organization.

The remaining two (2) members shall:

Be residents of this state; and

Not be, or ever have been, connected with a professional employer organization.

Among the members described in subdivision (b)(2)(B):

One (1) such member shall represent the consumer interests of this state; and

One (1) such member shall be a representative of the department.

The council shall elect a chair and other officers to a term of one (1) year or until a successor is elected. Meetings may be called by the chair or by any two (2) members. A meeting may be held by electronic means. Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum to conduct business. Whenever vacancies prevent a quorum, the remaining members shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of recommending to the governor appointments to the council.

Members shall serve without compensation.

The following are the powers and duties of the council:

Determine its rules of order and procedure;

Recommending to the governor appointments to the council;

Send notice of its agenda and proceedings to any requesting person;

Petition the department, pursuant to § 4-5-201 and as amended; and

Advise the department on this chapter.

The council is attached to the department for the purposes of administration and cooperation.

The department shall notify the council of any action pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5 and as amended, relating to a rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Any nonprofit organization representing five (5) or more professional employer organizations registered in this state may recommend appointments to the council.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-104. Confidentiality.

All records, reports and other information obtained from an applicant or registrant under this chapter, except to the extent necessary for the proper administration of this chapter by the department, shall be confidential and shall not be published or open to public inspection other than to public employees in the actual performance of their public duties.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

62-43-105. Chapter or professional employer agreements do not affect collective bargaining agreements, or federal or state labor relations law — Limits on chapter or professional employer agreements — Determination of tax credits and economic incentives.

Nothing contained in this chapter or in any professional employer agreement shall affect, modify or amend any collective bargaining agreement, or the rights or obligations of any client, professional employer organization or covered employee under:

The National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. §§ 151 et seq.), and as amended;

The Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. §§ 151 et seq.), and as amended; or

Applicable state labor relations law, compiled in titles 12 and 50 and as amended.

Nothing in this chapter or in any professional employer agreement shall:

Diminish, abolish or remove rights of covered employees to a client or obligations of such client to a covered employee existing prior to the effective date of the professional employer agreement;

Affect, modify or amend any contractual relationship or restrictive covenant between a covered employee and any client in effect at the time a professional employer agreement becomes effective;

Prohibit or amend any contractual relationship or restrictive covenant that is entered into subsequently between a client and a covered employee;

Impose responsibility or liability on a professional employer organization in connection with, or arising out of, any such existing or new contractual relationship or restrictive covenant between the client and a covered employee unless the professional employer organization has specifically agreed otherwise in writing; or

Create any new or additional enforceable right of a covered employee against a professional employer organization that is not specifically provided by the professional employer agreement or this chapter.

Nothing contained in this chapter or any professional employer agreement shall affect, modify or amend any state, local governmental entity or federal licensing, registration, or certification requirement applicable to any client or covered employee.

A covered employee who must be licensed, registered or certified according to law or regulation is deemed solely an employee of the client for purposes of any such license, registration or certification requirement.

A professional employer organization shall not be deemed to engage in any occupation, trade, profession or other activity that is subject to licensing, registration or certification requirements, or is otherwise regulated by a local governmental entity solely by entering into and maintaining a co-employment relationship with a covered employee who is subject to such requirements or regulation.

A client shall have the sole right of direction and control of the professional or licensed activities of covered employees and of the client's business. Such covered employees and clients shall remain subject to regulation by the state or local governmental entity responsible for licensing, registration or certification of such covered employees or clients.

For purposes of determination of tax credits and other economic incentives provided by this state, or a local government entity, and based on employment, covered employees may be deemed employees solely of the client.

A client may be eligible for any tax credit, economic incentive, or other benefit arising as the result of the employment of covered employees of the client.

Notwithstanding that the professional employer organization is the W-2 reporting employer, the client may continue to qualify for the benefit, incentive, or credit.

If the grant or amount of any such credit, incentive or benefit is based on the number of employees, then each client shall be treated as employing only those covered employees co-employed by the client. Covered employees working for other clients of the professional employer organization shall not be counted.

Each professional employer organization shall provide, upon request by a client, an agency or department of this state or local governmental entity, employment information reasonably required by any agency or department of this state responsible for administration of any such tax credit, economic incentive or benefit and necessary to support any request, claim, application or other action by a client seeking any such tax credit, economic incentive or benefit.

With respect to a bid, contract, purchase order or agreement entered into with this state or a local governmental entity, a client company's status or certification as a Tennessee small business, minority-owned business, Tennessee service-disabled veteran-owned business, disadvantaged business or woman-owned business, or as a historically underutilized business enterprise, is not affected because the client company has entered into an agreement with a professional employer organization or uses the services of a professional employer organization.

In a co-employment relationship:

The professional employer organization is entitled to enforce only such employer rights, and is subject to only those obligations, specifically allocated to the professional employer organization by the professional employer agreement or this chapter;

The client is entitled to enforce:

The rights, and obligated to provide and perform the employer obligations, allocated to the client by the professional employer agreement and this chapter; and

Any right or obligation, not specifically allocated to the professional employer organization by the professional employer agreement or this chapter.

A person is not a professional employer organization if the person:

Engages in a principal business activity that does not involve entering into professional employer arrangements;

Does not hold itself out as a professional employer organization; and

Shares employees with a commonly owned company within the meaning of §§ 414(b) and (c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

Provides temporary help services; or

Assumes responsibility through independent contractor arrangements for the product produced or service performed by such person or such person's agents and retains and exercises primary direction and control over the work performed by the individuals whose services are supplied under such arrangements.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1; 2015, ch. 84, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Confidential records, § 10-7-504.

62-43-106. Registration.

No person shall provide, advertise or otherwise hold itself out as providing professional employer services in this state unless such person is registered under this chapter.

The department shall register an applicant meeting the requirements of this chapter.

If the department denies registration to an applicant, the department shall provide written notice that includes the reasons for the denial. The applicant shall have sixty (60) days from the date the notice was sent to:

Submit proof to the department that the reasons for the denial have been cured; or

Request, in writing, reconsideration from the commissioner.

The department shall provide written notice of its determination after considering the applicant's submission or request under subdivisions (a)(3)(A)(i) or (a)(3)(A)(ii) within thirty (30) days of receiving a submission or request.

After submission of a written request for consideration, an initial applicant shall have the right to appear before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee to present the applicant's request for reconsideration. If an applicant wishes to appear before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee to present their request for reconsideration, then the department shall provide written notice of its determination within thirty (30) days after such appearance; provided, that it is the commissioner's decision as to whether or not the defect or defects have been cured and whether or not to issue the registration.

An applicant who is not an initial applicant may request a hearing pursuant to § 4-5-320 before the commissioner makes a final determination to deny a renewal registration.

Registration under this chapter shall remain in force for two (2) years from the date of issuance of registration.

Each applicant for initial registration under this chapter shall submit to the department the following:

Any name under which the applicant conducts business;

The address of the principal place of business of the applicant and of each office it maintains in this state;

The applicant's taxpayer or employer identification number;

A list by state of each name under which the applicant has operated in the preceding five (5) years, including any alternative names, names of predecessors and, if known, successor business entities;

A statement of ownership, which shall include the name, address and principal occupation of any person that, individually or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons, owns or controls, directly or indirectly:

Twenty percent (20%) or more of the equity interests of the applicant who is a publicly traded entity; or

Ten percent (10%) or more of the equity interest of the applicant who is not a publicly traded entity;

A statement of management, which shall include the name, address and principal occupation of any person who serves as president, chief executive officer or otherwise has the authority to act as a senior executive officer of the applicant;

If the applicant or a person listed in subdivisions (b)(5) or (6) has in any jurisdiction:

Been convicted of or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a crime relating to the operation of a professional employer organization;

Been disciplined relating to the operation of a professional employer organization;

Been convicted of or entered a plea of nolo contendere to an offense relating to bribery, dishonesty or fraud;

Been convicted of or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any felony. However, an action taken under this subdivision (b)(7)(D) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title; or

Been found liable for civil fraud;

A financial statement setting forth the financial condition of the applicant; provided, that:

The applicant shall submit the most recent audit of the applicant with its initial application;

No financial statement submitted with the initial application shall be older than thirteen (13) months from the date of the report of the auditor;

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the close of an applicant's fiscal year, the applicant shall submit its most recent financial statement; provided, that an applicant may apply to the department for additional time to submit its financial statements, and such a request shall be accompanied by a letter from the auditors stating the reasons for the delay and the anticipated audit completion date;

Financial statements submitted pursuant to this subdivision (b)(8) shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and audited by an independent certified public accountant licensed to practice in the jurisdiction in which such accountant is located; provided, that no resulting report of the auditor shall include:

A qualification or disclaimer of opinion as to adherence to generally accepted accounting principles; or

A statement expressing substantial doubt about the ability of the applicant to continue as a going concern;

An applicant may submit combined or consolidated audited financial statements to meet the requirements of this section;

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(8)(D)(i):

An applicant that has not had sufficient operating history to have financial statements based upon at least twelve (12) months of operating history shall meet the financial capacity requirements in subsection (c) and submit financial statements reviewed by an independent certified public accountant; and

If an applicant is a subsidiary or is related to a variable interest entity, then the applicant may submit financial statements of the professional employer organization, professional employer organization group or the controlling organization;

In lieu of audited financial statements required by this subdivision (b)(8), an applicant or registrant with small operations may submit financial statements compiled by an independent certified public accountant;

The department shall consider an applicant or registrant a professional employer organization with small operations if the applicant or registrant submits to the department:

A request to be deemed a PEO with small operations on a form prescribed by the department; and

The most recent fourth quarter federal Form 941 of the applicant or registrant and any related person that offers professional employer services; provided, the aggregate annualized wages shall be less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000);

The form required in subdivision (b)(8)(G)(ii) shall be submitted to the department in any year the applicant or registrant seeks to be considered a professional employer organization with small operations;

In any year that an applicant or registrant with small operations does not meet the requirements to maintain such status, that applicant or registrant shall have six (6) months from the close of the current fiscal year of the applicant or registrant to either:

Meet the requirements of this subdivision (b)(8)(G); or

Submit audited financial statements;

Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for covered employees in this state who are subject to the Tennessee Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6 and as amended; and

A written statement in regards to whether the applicant sponsors a self-insured health plan.

Except as provided by subdivision (b)(8)(F)(i) and subsection (f), an applicant shall maintain either:

Positive working capital at registration as reflected in the financial statements submitted to the department under subdivision (b)(8); or

An applicant that does not have positive working capital may provide a bond, irrevocable letter of credit or securities with a minimum market value equaling the deficiency plus one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the department; provided, that such instruments are to be held by an institution designated by the department, securing payment by the applicant of all taxes, wages, benefits or other entitlements due to or with respect to covered employees if the applicant does not make such payments when due.

No later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the applicant's fiscal year that is the second year of its current registration, the applicant may renew its registration by:

Notifying the department of any changes in the information submitted under subsection (b); and

Submitting the financial statement required under subdivision (b)(8) or the alternatives under subdivision (b)(8)(G) or subsection (c), as applicable.

An applicant's existing registration shall remain in effect during the pendency of a renewal application.

An applicant who is a professional employer organization group may satisfy the requirements in this section on a combined or consolidated basis; provided, that each member of the professional employer organization group guarantees the financial capacity obligations under this chapter of each other member of the professional employer organization group. In the case of a professional employer organization group that submits a combined or consolidated audited financial statement including entities that are not professional employer organizations or that are not in the professional employer organization group, the controlling entity of the professional employer organization group under the consolidated or combined statement shall guarantee the obligations of the professional employer organizations in the professional employer organization group.

An applicant is eligible for a limited registration under this chapter if such applicant:

Submits a request for limited registration to the department;

Is domiciled outside this state and is licensed or registered as a professional employer organization in another state;

Does not maintain an office in this state or directly solicits clients located or domiciled within this state; and

Does not have more than fifty (50) covered employees employed or domiciled in this state.

Limited registration is valid for two (2) years and may be renewed.

An applicant seeking limited registration under this subsection (f) shall provide the department with information and documentation necessary to show that the applicant qualifies for a limited registration.

Subdivision (b)(8) and subsection (c) shall not apply to applicants for limited registration.

Notwithstanding § 62-43-104, the department shall maintain a list of registrants that is readily available to the public by electronic or other means.

The department shall to the extent practical, permit the acceptance of electronic filings in conformance with the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 10 and as amended, including applications, documents, reports and other filings required by this chapter.

The department may provide for the acceptance of electronic filings and other assurance by an independent and qualified assurance organization approved by the department that provides satisfactory assurance of compliance acceptable to the department consistent with or in lieu of the requirements in subsections (b) and (c), and other requirements of this chapter or the rules promulgated pursuant to it.

The department may permit an applicant to authorize such an approved assurance organization to act on the applicant's behalf in complying with the registration requirements of this chapter, including electronic filings of information and payment of registration fees; provided, that use of such an approved assurance organization shall be optional and not mandatory for an applicant.

Nothing in this subsection (h) shall limit or change the department's authority to register or terminate registration of a registrant or applicant or to investigate or enforce this chapter.

A registrant shall:

Submit to the department, within ninety (90) days of the end of each calendar quarter, a statement by an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant that for the quarter all applicable payroll taxes have been paid on a timely basis. Upon a showing of reasonable cause, one (1) thirty-day extension per quarter shall be granted by the department;

Maintain and make available for the department's inspection any and all records concerning the registrant's conduct of business under its registration, which records shall be maintained for a period of three (3) years after termination of the professional employer agreement;

Notify the department in writing of a change in the information submitted under subdivisions (b)(1)-(7) within thirty (30) days of such change;

Post the registration issued under this chapter in a conspicuous place in the principal place of business and display in clear public view in each registrant's office in this state a notice stating that the professional employer organization is licensed and regulated by the department and that any questions or complaints should be directed to the department; and

Submit a written response to a written inquiry from the department within thirty (30) days of receiving the inquiry.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1; 2018, ch. 745, § 21.

62-43-107. Fees.

The department may establish the following fees by rule:

Initial application fee;

Initial registration fee, which includes a fee for limited registration, as applicable; and

Renewal registration fee.

No fee charged pursuant to this section shall exceed the amount reasonably necessary for the administration of this chapter. All fees collected by this state pursuant to this chapter shall be used by the department to implement and administer this chapter. The fees shall be deposited in a reserve for such purposes and the principal and interest of the reserve shall not revert on June 30 of any year.

Fees under this section shall be:

Remitted with the application or with the hearing request;

Payable to this state; and

Nonrefundable.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.

62-43-108. Basis of co-employment relationship.

The co-employment relationship shall be based on a written professional employer agreement between the client and the professional employer organization setting forth the responsibilities and duties of each co-employer. The professional employer agreement shall disclose to the client the services to be rendered, including charges and fees, the respective rights and obligations of the parties and provide that the professional employer organization:

Reserves a right of direction and control over covered employees of the client; however, the client may retain sufficient direction and control over covered employees that is necessary to conduct the client's business and without which the client would be unable to conduct its business, discharge any fiduciary responsibility that it may have or comply with any applicable licensure, regulatory or statutory requirement of the client;

Pursuant to this section, assumes responsibility for the payment of wages of its covered employees, its payroll-related taxes and its employee benefits from its own accounts without regard to payments by the client to the professional employer organization; and

Retains a right to hire, terminate and discipline covered employees.

A professional employer organization shall give written notice of the general nature of the relationship between the professional employer organization and the client to each covered employee.

A professional employer organization shall be deemed an employer of its covered employees and shall pay wages to covered employees; withhold, collect, report and remit payroll-related and unemployment taxes; and, to the extent the professional employer organization has assumed responsibility in the professional employer agreement, make payments for employee benefits for covered employees. As used in this section, the term “wages” does not include any obligation between a client and a covered employee for payments beyond or in addition to the covered employee's salary, draw, or regular rate of pay, such as bonuses, commissions, severance pay, deferred compensation, profit sharing or vacation, sick or other paid time off pay, unless the professional employer organization has expressly agreed to assume liability for such payments in the professional employer agreement.

Except to the extent otherwise expressly provided by the applicable professional employer agreement:

A client shall be solely responsible for the quality, adequacy or safety of the goods or services produced or sold in client's business;

A client shall be solely responsible for directing, supervising, training and controlling the work of the covered employees with respect to the business activities of the client and solely responsible for the acts, errors or omissions of the covered employees with regard to such activities;

A client shall not be liable for the acts, errors, or omissions of a professional employer organization, or of any covered employee of the client and a professional employer organization when such covered employee is acting under the express direction and control of the professional employer organization;

A professional employer organization shall not be liable for the acts, errors, or omissions of a client or of any covered employee of the client when such covered employee is acting under the express direction and control of the client;

Nothing in this subsection (b) shall serve to limit any contractual liability or obligation specifically provided in the written professional employer agreement; and

A covered employee is not, solely as the result of being a covered employee of a professional employer organization, an employee of the professional employer organization for purposes of general liability insurance, fidelity bonds, surety bonds, employer's liability which is not covered by workers' compensation, or liquor liability insurance carried by the professional employer organization unless the covered employees are included by specific reference in the professional employer agreement and applicable prearranged employment contract, insurance contract or bond.

A professional employer organization may sponsor and maintain employee benefit and welfare plans for the benefit of its covered employees. Any of those plans that are plans of insurance shall comply with the applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state. The self-insured plans developed under this section are not subject to premium taxes. The department may promulgate rules regulating self-insured plans under this section.

An applicant or registrant shall disclose to the department, to each client company and to all eligible covered employees the following information relating to any benefit plan of insurance provided for the benefit of its covered employees:

The type of coverage and a copy of the insurance policy or certificate or summary plan description;

The identity of each insurer for each type of coverage;

The amount of benefits for each type of coverage and to whom or on whose behalf benefits will be paid; and

The policy limits on each insurance policy.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall require a professional employer organization to provide comparable benefits to covered employees located at different clients.

The sale of professional employer services in conformance with this chapter shall not constitute the sale of insurance within the meaning of applicable state law.

Acts 2012, ch. 1081, § 1.